Missouri, session 2026, HB3153.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section 1. 1. The governor is hereby authorized and empowered to sell, transfer,
grant, convey, remise, release, and forever quitclaim all interest of the state of Missouri
in property located in the city of Springfield, Greene County, Missouri. The property to
be conveyed is more particularly described as follows:
Beginning 69 feet North of the Southeast corner of Lot 17, Block 5 in the Original
Plat of the Town of Springfield, Missouri, running thence North 43.8 feet to Olive
Street, thence West 103.2 feet to Baker Arcade, thence South 43.3 feet, thence
East 103.2 feet to point of beginning, all in the City of Springfield, Greene
County, Missouri.
2. The commissioner of administration shall set the terms and conditions for the
conveyance as the commissioner deems reasonable. Such terms and conditions may
include, but not be limited to, the number of appraisals required and the time, place,
and terms of the conveyance.
3. The attorney general shall approve the form of the instrument of conveyance.
Section 2. 1. The governor is hereby authorized and empowered to sell, transfer,
grant, convey, remise, release, and forever quitclaim all interest of the state of Missouri
in property located in the city of Springfield, Greene County, Missouri. The property to
be conveyed is more particularly described as follows:
Beginning at a point on the North side of East Walnut Street 431 5/6 feet East of
the Southwest corner of Lot 84, Block 23, of the Original Plat of Springfield,
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3153 2
Missouri, which point is the Southeast corner of James E. Keet's Lot, thence East
along the North side of East Walnut Street to fence of J. L. Carson's Lot, thence
North along said fence and on line with same 240 feet, thence West to the East
line of Keet's Lot, thence South with Keet's East Line to beginning, being 86 feet
front on East Walnut Street, more or less, all in the City of Springfield, Greene
County, Missouri.
Beginning on the North line of East Walnut Street at the Southwest corner of
Bray lot, thence West 82-1/2 feet to the East line of a lot formerly owned by
Charles T. Keet, thence North 240 feet thence West 82-1/2 feet, thence North 27-
1/2 feet, thence East 165 feet, thence South 267 feet to the beginning, all in the
Southeast quarter of the Northwest quarter of Section 24, Township 29, Range
22, except that part deeded in Book 1555, page 1689, described as beginning on
the North line of East Walnut Street in Springfield, Missouri, at the Southwest
corner of the Bray Lot, said beginning point being 165.31 feet Southeast of the
Northeast corner of Benton Alley, and Walnut; thence West 82.5 feet to the East
line of lot formerly owned by Charles T. Keet; thence North 240 feet to point of
new beginning; thence West 82.5 feet at an exterior angle of 89 degrees 50 min.,
thence North 24.7 feet at an interior angel of 89 degrees 43 min., thence East 82.4
feet more or less thence South 23.1 feet to point of beginning all in the Southeast
Quarter of the Northwest quarter, Section 24, Range 22.
Beginning on the South side of St. Louis Street at a point fifty (50) feet west of the
Northwest corner of a lot known at one time as the W. J. McDaniel Lot, which
point is now the Northwest corner of the Simmons Lot (formerly the A. J.
Clements lot), thence West along the South side of St. Louis Street fifty (50) feet
to Bryan's Northeast corner, thence South to South Alley now McDaniel Street,
thence East fifty (50) feet to the Southwest corner of the lot formerly belonging to
said Clements, thence North to the beginning, all in the City of Springfield,
Missouri. Also described as Beginning 50 feet West of the Northwest corner of
Lot 1, Kimbroughs Addition, West 50 feet, thence South 222 feet to McDaniel
Street, East 50 feet, North to the beginning.
Commencing at the northeast corner of Walnut and Jefferson Streets; thence
South 87°53'42" East 310.5 feet along the north right-of-way line of Walnut
Street to an iron pin; thence North 0°45'23" West 206.81 feet to an iron pin for a
point of beginning; thence continuing North 0°45'23" West 181.83 feet to a
chiseled "X" in concrete on the South right-of-way line of McDaniel Street;
thence North 89°06' East 107.19 feet along the South right-of-way line of
McDaniel Street to an iron pin; thence South 1°24'33" East 184.71 feet to an iron

HB 3153 3
pin; thence North 89°23'31" West 109.33 feet to the point of beginning.
Containing 0.45 acres in the City of Springfield, Greene County, Missouri.
2. The commissioner of administration shall set the terms and conditions for the
conveyance as the commissioner deems reasonable. Such terms and conditions may
include, but not be limited to, the number of appraisals required and the time, place,
and terms of the conveyance.
3. The attorney general shall approve the form of the instrument of conveyance.
✔